Hawaii statutes.
[§235-20] Comfort letters; authority to
assess fees; established. The department may assess and collect a fee for
the issuance of any comfort letter of the department. All fees collected under
this section shall be deposited into the tax administration special fund
established under section 235-20.5. [L 2004, c 215, pt of §3]

Note

L 2004, c 215, §13 provides:

"SECTION 13. Any comfort letter or other written
communication issued by the department of taxation prior to the effective date
of this Act [July 1, 2004] may continue to be relied upon by the taxpayer to
whom such comfort letter or other written communication was issued (including
the qualified high technology business and its investors) and shall be
respected by the department of taxation, notwithstanding any of the amendments
contained in this Act, provided that the assumptions and representations
contained in such comfort letter or other written communication remain true and
accurate in all material respects. The high technology provisions of sections
235-2.4, 235-2.45, 235-7.3, 235-9.5, 235-110.51, 235-110.9, 235-110.91,
235-111.5, and 237-23.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, in effect at the time of the
comfort letter or other written communication shall continue to apply without
regard to any amendments to such provisions under this Act with respect to any
transactions or investments made or committed prior to the effective date of
this Act [July 1, 2004]."

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next